Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2430.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Office of Transformation and Opportunity Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth."Office." The Office of Transformation and Opportunity established under section 3."Officer." The Chief Transformation and Opportunity Officer appointed under section 3.1234567891011121314151617 Section 3. Office of Transformation and Opportunity.(a) Establishment.--The Office of Transformation and Opportunity is established within the Office of the Governor.(b) Purpose.--The office shall:(1) Facilitate the implementation of transformational economic development projects, which will result in substantial quality job opportunities and capital investment in this Commonwealth by coordinating and expediting interagency cooperation.(2) Marshal Federal and State resources to maximize economic development opportunities for this Commonwealth to compete, grow and thrive in a global economy.(3) Leverage the role of the Governor as chief executive of the Commonwealth to engage the global business community on the Commonwealth's behalf.(c) Responsibilities.--The office shall:(1) Create a systematic process for managing economic development projects involving the resources of multiple Commonwealth agencies to facilitate project management.(2) Establish and monitor the progress of additional areas of economic development project support, including:(i) Serving as a one-stop-shop for coordination of Commonwealth agencies.(ii) Expediting Commonwealth agency permit and license reviews.(iii) Ensuring speed of business review and approval of Commonwealth economic incentive programs.(3) Work in partnership with the department and all relevant Commonwealth agencies in reviewing Federal and State funding applications to ensure that the applications maximize 20260HB2430PN3235 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the opportunity to attract transformational economic development projects.(4) Establish objectives and targets for the implementation of transformative economic development.(5) Establish and monitor time-based standards for completion of each phase of a transformative economic development project.(6) Work in partnership with the department and all relevant Commonwealth agencies and coordinate with the Governor's Office to ensure that thorough due diligence is performed for prioritized projects, which shall include:(i) Overall economic impact of the project.(ii) The validity of the project's business model and likelihood of positive impact on an identified priority industry or sector.(iii) The impact on communities that have been disadvantaged and underserved.(iv) The strength of commitments for private financing of the project.(7) Work in partnership with the department, all relevant Commonwealth agencies and the Governor to develop an overall economic development blueprint and strategy for this Commonwealth in identifying key industries and sectors where this Commonwealth has competitive advantages.(8) Employ a Commonwealth Housing Ombudsman to coordinate policies and adjudicate disputes across Commonwealth agencies in recognition of the critical social, economic and workforce needs within the residential housing industry.(d) Staffing and administration.--20260HB2430PN3235 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The Governor shall appoint a Chief Transformation and Opportunity Officer of the office, who shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor and who shall coordinate the implementation and development of the responsibilities under subsection (c).(2) The officer may hire staff, including economic development specialists, to perform the responsibilities assigned to the office under subsection (c).(3) The officer shall report directly to the Governor, and the office shall be housed within the Governor's Office.(e) Annual report.--(1) The office shall prepare and issue an annual report to the Governor no later than December 31 of each year.(2) The annual report shall include an analysis and examination of significant economic development opportunities gained and lost by this Commonwealth within an identified time period and recommendations for improvement.(3) The report shall be delivered to the Governor or the Governor's designee.(f) Responsibilities of Commonwealth agencies.--All Commonwealth agencies shall cooperate with and provide assistance to the office with respect to its purpose and responsibilities as provided under this act.(g) Construction.--(1) Nothing in this act shall be construed to impair or otherwise affect the authority granted by law to an executive department, agency, office, board, commission or council or the head thereof.(2) This act is not intended to and does not create any right or benefit, substantive or procedural, enforceable at 20260HB2430PN3235 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 law or in equity by any party against the Commonwealth, its departments, agencies or entities, its officers, employees or agents or any other person.Section 4. Commonwealth Housing Ombudsman.The Commonwealth Housing Ombudsman designated under section 3(c)(8) shall:(1) Coordinate and report on the activities undertaken by Commonwealth agencies related to residential construction permits.(2) Issue a report to the following summarizing work performed under this act:(i) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Urban Affairs and Housing Committee of the Senate.(ii) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Housing and Community Development Committee of the House of Representatives.(3) Facilitate and participate on the office's behalf in discussions between units of State government, local government and housing developers to assist with navigation through permitting requirements and processes.(4) Evaluate if there are opportunities for the Commonwealth to acquire land to further housing development project opportunities.(5) Evaluate methods to improve the housing building materials supply chain in this Commonwealth.(6) Gather and compile information on local permitting and planning and zoning processes throughout this Commonwealth and identify hurdles to timely housing development in those processes.(7) Track the progress of housing development projects 20260HB2430PN3235 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 throughout this Commonwealth and provide periodic updates to office leadership and the Governor's Office on housing production in this Commonwealth.(8) Provide binding determinations on substantive disputes between developers and Commonwealth agencies that negatively impact housing development timelines.Section 5. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2430PN3235 - 6 - 12345678